Utah statutes.
17B-1-642.   Approval of district expenditures.
(1)  The board of trustees of each local district shall approve all
expenditures of the district except as otherwise provided in this section.
(2)  The board of trustees may authorize the district manager or other
official approved by the board to act as the financial officer for the purpose
of approving:
(a)  payroll checks, if the checks are prepared in accordance with a schedule
approved by the board; and
(b)  routine expenditures, such as utility bills, payroll-related expenses,
supplies, and materials.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), the board of trustees shall, at least
quarterly, review all expenditures authorized by the financial officer.
(4)  The board of trustees shall set a maximum sum over which all purchases
may not be made without the board's approval.
